trunk/apertium-sv-da/apertium-sv-da.da.dix
    <pardef n="f/od__n"> <!-- Common; ~od / ~oden / ~ødder / ~ødderne; Vowel change o→ø in plural -->
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>od</l>
          <r>od<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="S__case"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>oden</l>
          <r>od<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="S__case"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ødder</l>
          <r>od<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="S__case"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ødderne</l>
          <r>od<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="S__case"/>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="lag/en__n"> <!-- Neuter; ~en / ~net / ~ner / ~nerne -->
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>en</l>
          <r>en<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="S__case"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>net</l>
          <r>en<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="S__case"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ner</l>
          <r>en<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="S__case"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>nerne</l>
          <r>en<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="S__case"/>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="portræt__n"> <!-- Neuter; ~t / ~tet / ~ter / ~terne -->
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="S__case"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>tet</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="S__case"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ter</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="S__case"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>terne</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="S__case"/>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="f/ar__n"> <!-- Common; ~ar / ~aren / ~ædre / ~ædrene -->
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ar</l>
          <r>ar<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="S__case"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>aren</l>
          <r>ar<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="S__case"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ædre</l>
          <r>ar<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="S__case"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ædrene</l>
          <r>ar<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="S__case"/>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="mad__n"> <!-- Common; ~ / ~en / # / #; uncountable -->
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
	<par n="S__case"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>en</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
	<par n="S__case"/>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="program__n"> <!-- Neuter; ~ / ~met / ~mer / ~merne -->
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
	<par n="S__case"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>met</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
	<par n="S__case"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>mer</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
	<par n="S__case"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>merne</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
	<par n="S__case"/>
      </e>
    </pardef>


    <pardef n="brud__n"> <!-- Neuter; ~ / ~det / ~ / ~dene -->
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
	<par n="S__case"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>det</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
	<par n="S__case"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
	<par n="S__case"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>dene</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
	<par n="S__case"/>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="alt/er__n"> <!-- Neuter; ~er / ~ret | (~eret) / ~re / ~rene -->
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>er</l>
          <r>er<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
	<par n="S__case"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ret</l>
          <r>er<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
	<par n="S__case"/>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>eret</l>
          <r>er<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
	<par n="S__case"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>re</l>
          <r>er<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
	<par n="S__case"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>rene</l>
          <r>er<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
	<par n="S__case"/>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="jordbær__n"> <!-- Neuter; ~ / ~ret / ~ / ~rene -->
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
	<par n="S__case"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ret</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
	<par n="S__case"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
	<par n="S__case"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>rene</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
	<par n="S__case"/>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="mail__n"> <!-- Common; ~ / ~en / ~s | (~) / ~ene -->
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
	<par n="S__case"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>en</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
	<par n="S__case"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>s</l>
	  <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
	<par n="S__case"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ene</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
	<par n="S__case"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>s'</l>
	  <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="menneske__n"> <!-- Neuter; ~ / ~t / ~r / ~rne | (~ne) -->
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
	<par n="S__case"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>t</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
	<par n="S__case"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>r</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
	<par n="S__case"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>rne</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
	<par n="S__case"/>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>ne</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
	<par n="S__case"/>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <e lm="alter"><i>alt</i><par n="alt/er__n"/></e>
    <e lm="fod"><i>f</i><par n="f/od__n"/></e>
    <e lm="korset"><i>korset</i><par n="portræt__n"/></e>
    <e lm="lagen"><i>lag</i><par n="lag/en__n"/></e>
    <e lm="mail"><i>mail</i><par n="mail__n"/></e>
    <e lm="menneske"><i>menneske</i><par n="menneske__n"/></e>
    <e lm="mad"><i>mad</i><par n="mad__n"/></e>
    <e lm="portræt"><i>portræt</i><par n="portræt__n"/></e>
    <e lm="program"><i>program</i><par n="program__n"/></e>
    <e lm="far"><i>f</i><par n="f/ar__n"/></e>
    <e lm="jordbær"><i>jordbær</i><par n="jordbær__n"/></e>
    <e lm="brud"><i>brud</i><par n="brud__n"/></e>
    <e lm="bid"><i>bid</i><par n="brud__n"/></e>
